Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Disposition
§ 43-21-617.
Protective orders.

In all cases where the child is found to be a delinquent child, a child in need of supervision, a neglected child or an abused child, the parent, guardian, custodian or any other person who, by any act or acts of wilful commission or omission, if found after notice and a hearing by the youth court to be encouraging, causing or contributing to the neglect or delinquency of such child, may be required by the youth court to do or to omit to do any act or acts that the judge may deem reasonable and necessary for the welfare of the child.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 43-21-619.
Power to order parents to pay child’s expenses and restitution or to participate in counseling or family treatment program; orders to constitute civil judgment.

The youth court may order financially able parents to pay for court ordered medical and other examinations and treatment of a child; for reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs; and for other expenses found necessary or appropriate in the best interest of the child as determined by the youth court. The youth court is authorized to enforce payments ordered under this subsection.

The youth court may order the parents, guardians or custodians who exercise parental custody and control of a child who is under the jurisdiction of the youth court and who has willfully or maliciously caused personal injury or damaged or destroyed property, to pay such damages or restitution through the court to the victim in an amount not to exceed the actual loss and to enforce payment thereof. Restitution ordered by the youth court under this section shall not preclude recovery of damages by the victim from such child or parent, guardian or custodian or other person who would otherwise be liable. The youth court also may order the parents, guardians or custodians of a child who is under the jurisdiction of the youth court and who willfully or maliciously has caused personal injury or damaged or destroyed property to participate in a counseling program or other suitable family treatment program for the purpose of preventing future occurrences of malicious destruction of property or personal injury.

Such orders under this section shall constitute a civil judgment and may be enrolled on the judgment rolls in the office of the circuit clerk of the county where such order was entered, and further, such order may be enforced in any manner provided by law for civil judgments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 441, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 560, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 43-21-621.
Power to order public school to enroll child; placement in alternative school program; school-related conditions of probation; notification of principal.

The youth court may, in compliance with the laws governing education of children, order any state-supported public school in its jurisdiction after notice and hearing to enroll or reenroll any compulsory-school-age child in school, and further order appropriate educational services. Provided, however, that the youth court shall not order the enrollment or reenrollment of a student that has been suspended or expelled by a public school pursuant to Section 37-9-71 or 37-7-301 for possession of a weapon on school grounds, for an offense involving a threat to the safety of other persons or for the commission of a violent act. For the purpose of this section “violent act” means any action which results in death or physical harm to another or an attempt to cause death or physical harm to another. The superintendent of the school district to which such child is ordered may, in his discretion, assign such child to the alternative school program of such school established pursuant to Section 37-13-92, Mississippi Code of 1972. The court shall have jurisdiction to enforce school and education laws. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the attendance of a child in a legitimate home instruction program.

The youth court may specify the following conditions of probation related to any juvenile ordered to enroll or reenroll in school: That the juvenile maintain passing grades in up to four (4) courses during each grading period and meet with the court counselor and a representative of the school to make a plan for how to maintain those passing grades.

If the adjudication of delinquency was for an offense involving a threat to the safety of the juvenile or others and school attendance is a condition of probation, the youth court judge shall make a finding that the principal of the juvenile’s school should be notified. If the judge orders that the principal be notified, the youth court counselor shall within five (5) days or before the juvenile begins to attend school, whichever occurs first, notify the principal of the juvenile’s school in writing of the nature of the offense and the probation requirements related to school attendance. A principal notified by a juvenile court counselor shall handle the report according to the guidelines and rules adopted by the State Board of Education.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall report to the Legislature on the number of juveniles reported to principals in accordance with this section no later than January 1, 1996.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 441, § 5; Laws, 1993, ch. 543, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 607, § 7, eff from and after July 2, 1994.

§ 43-21-623.
Testing of juvenile delinquents under the jurisdiction of the youth court for HIV and AIDS.

Any juvenile who is adjudicated a delinquent on or after July 1, 1994, as a result of committing a sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23 or any offense involving the crime of rape and placed in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Human Services, Office of Youth Services, shall be tested for HIV and AIDS. Such tests shall be conducted by the State Department of Health in conjunction with the Office of Youth Services, Mississippi Department of Human Services at the request of the victim or the victim’s parents or guardian if the victim is a juvenile. The results of any positive HIV or AIDS tests shall be reported to the victim or the victim’s parents or guardian if the victim is a juvenile as well as to the adjudicated offender. The State Department of Health shall provide counseling and referral to appropriate treatment for victims of a sex offense when the adjudicated offender tested positive for HIV or AIDS if the victim so requests.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 504, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 43-21-625.
Wilderness training program for certain juvenile offenders.

The Department of Human Services shall develop and implement a wilderness training program for first time youth offenders sentenced or classified as delinquency cases or as children in need of supervision.

The program shall include supervised camping trips, calisthenics, manual labor assignments, physical training with obstacle courses, training in decision-making and personal development and drug counseling and rehabilitation programs.

The department shall adopt rules requiring that wilderness training participants complete a structured disciplinary program and allowing for a restriction on general inmate population privileges.

Upon receipt of youth offenders, the department shall screen offenders for the wilderness training program. To participate, an offender must have no physical limitations which would preclude participation in strenuous activity, must not be impaired and must not have been previously incarcerated in a state or federal correctional facility. In screening offenders for the wilderness training program, the department shall consider the offender’s criminal history and the possible rehabilitative benefits of the program. If an offender meets the specified criteria and space is available, the department shall request in writing from the sentencing court, approval to participate in the wilderness training program. If the person is classified by the court as a delinquent or child in need of supervision and the department is requesting approval from the sentencing court for placement in the program, the department shall, at the same time, notify the prosecuting attorney that the offender is being considered for placement in the wilderness training program. The notice shall explain that the purpose of such placement is diversion from lengthy incarceration when a wilderness training program could produce the same deterrent effect, and that the person given notice may, within fourteen (14) days of the mailing of the notice, notify the sentencing court in writing of objections, if any, to the placement of the offender in the wilderness training program. The sentencing court shall notify the department in writing of placement approval no later than twenty-one (21) days after receipt of the department’s request for placement of the youthful offender in the wilderness training program. Failure to notify the department within twenty-one (21) days shall be considered an approval by the sentencing court for placing the youthful offender in the wilderness training program. The offices of the prosecuting attorneys may develop procedures for notifying each victim that the offender is being considered for placement in the wilderness training program.

The program shall provide a period of rigorous training to offenders who require a greater degree of supervision than community control or probation provides. Wilderness training programs may be operated in secure areas in or adjacent to adult institutions or in any area approved by the department. The program is not intended to divert offenders away from probation or community control but to divert them from long periods of incarceration when a wilderness training program could produce the same deterrent effect.

If an offender in the wilderness training program becomes unmanageable, the department may place him in an appropriate facility to complete the remainder of his sentence. Any period of time in which the offender is unable to participate in the wilderness training program activities may be excluded from the specified time requirements in the program. The portion of the sentence served prior to placement in the wilderness training program shall not be counted toward program completion. Upon the offender’s completion of the wilderness training program, the department shall submit a report to the court that describes the offender’s performance. If the offender’s performance has been satisfactory, the court shall issue an order modifying the sentence imposed and placing the offender on probation. If the offender violates the conditions of probation, the court may revoke probation and impose any sentence which it might have originally imposed.

The department shall provide a special training program for staff selected for the wilderness training program.

The department is authorized to contract with any private or public nonprofit organization or entity to carry out the purpose of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 473, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-21-627.
Alternative work program; qualified offenders; volunteers; supervision; removal from program.

Each youth court is authorized to establish a youth court work program as an alternative disposition for nonviolent offenders. The youth court work program shall be used only for first time nonviolent youth offenders. The court shall solicit and approve the assistance of volunteers from the area served by the youth court, including business and community volunteers. The court may require a nonviolent youth offender to work for a minimum of six (6) months with a court approved volunteer as part or all of a sentence imposed by the court. The volunteers shall provide a working environment as mentors to provide guidance and support and to teach the youth offender job skills. Each youth offender and volunteer shall be under the supervision of the court and shall make regular reports to the court as required by order of the court. If a youth offender violates the terms and conditions imposed by the court while participating in the youth court work program, the court is authorized to remove the offender from the program and impose any other disposition authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.